zh-TW: 適用球桌尺寸: 10 呎; 12 呎; 6 呎; 7 呎; 8 呎; 9 呎; 其他
sk-SK: Vhodná veľkosť stola: 10 stôp; 12 stôp; 6 stôp; 7 stôp; 8 stôp; 9 stôp; Iné
vi: Kích thước bàn phù hợp: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Khác
da: Egnet bordstørrelse: 10 fod; 12 fod; 6 fod; 7 fod; 8 fod; 9 fod; Andet
tr: Uygun masa boyutu: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Diğer
cs: Vhodná velikost stolu: 10 stop; 12 stop; 6 stop; 7 stop; 8 stop; 9 stop; Jiné
ru: Подходящий размер стола: 10 футов; 12 футов; 6 футов; 7 футов; 8 футов; 9 футов; Другое
hu: Megfelelő asztalméret: 10 láb; 12 láb; 6 láb; 7 láb; 8 láb; 9 láb; Egyéb
hr-HR: Prikladna veličina stola: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tamanho de mesa adequado: 10 pés; 12 pés; 6 pés; 7 pés; 8 pés; 9 pés; Outro
el: Κατάλληλο μέγεθος τραπεζιού: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Άλλο
pl: Odpowiedni rozmiar stołu: 10 stóp; 12 stóp; 6 stóp; 7 stóp; 8 stóp; 9 stóp; Inny
en: Suitable table size: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Other
ja: 対応テーブルサイズ: 10フィート; 12フィート; 6フィート; 7フィート; 8フィート; 9フィート; その他
it: Misura adatta del tavolo: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Altro
sl-SI: Primerna velikost mize: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Drugo
sv: Lämplig bordsstorlek: 10 fot; 12 fot; 6 fot; 7 fot; 8 fot; 9 fot; Övrigt
lt-LT: Tinkamas stalo dydis: 10 pėd.; 12 pėd.; 6 pėd.; 7 pėd.; 8 pėd.; 9 pėd.; Kitas
fr: Taille de table compatible: 10 pi; 12 pi; 6 pi; 7 pi; 8 pi; 9 pi; Autre
es: Tamaño de mesa adecuado: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Otro
zh-CN: 适用球桌尺寸: 10 英尺; 12 英尺; 6 英尺; 7 英尺; 8 英尺; 9 英尺; 其他
nb: Egnet bordstørrelse: 10 fot; 12 fot; 6 fot; 7 fot; 8 fot; 9 fot; Annet
th: ขนาดโต๊ะที่เหมาะสม: 10 ฟุต; 12 ฟุต; 6 ฟุต; 7 ฟุต; 8 ฟุต; 9 ฟุต; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Подходящ размер на масата: 10 фута; 12 фута; 6 фута; 7 фута; 8 фута; 9 фута; Друго
fi: Sopiva pöydän koko: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Muu
ro-RO: Dimensiuni adecvate ale mesei: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Altele
nl: Geschikte tafelmaat: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Overig
de: Geeignete Tischgröße: 10 ft; 12 ft; 6 ft; 7 ft; 8 ft; 9 ft; Sonstige
ko: 적합한 당구대 사이즈: 10피트; 12피트; 6피트; 7피트; 8피트; 9피트; 기타
pt-BR: Tamanho de mesa adequado: 10 pés; 12 pés; 6 pés; 7 pés; 8 pés; 9 pés; Outros